Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Water, Sewer, Garbage Disposal, and Fire Protection Districts
§ 19-5-181.
Revenue bonds; special improvement water and pollution abatement bonds; tax levies therefor.

Any such district shall have the power to provide funds for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, bettering or extending the facilities of such district or for the purpose of buying, leasing, or otherwise acquiring the assets and facilities of any nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to the provisions of Sections 79-11-101 through 79-11-399, or any other utility district by the issuance of revenue bonds. Such bonds shall be payable solely and only from the revenues of such facilities, and such revenues may be pledged from a portion of the service area of the district to the support of debt service for a specific series or issue of bonds if such apportionment is economically feasible.

Any such district shall have the power to provide funds, in addition to or in conjunction with the funds authorized in subsection (1) above, for water supply or pollution abatement projects by issuing special improvement pollution abatement bonds, special improvement water bonds, or combinations of special improvement water and sewer bonds, if the resolution creating the district authorized the board of supervisors to make assessments against benefited properties as outlined in Section 19-5-191. Such bonds shall be payable solely and only from charges assessed to benefited properties as outlined in said Section 19-5-191.

If the board of supervisors of the county should levy a special tax, as provided in Section 19-5-189, and consent to the pledge of any part thereof, then that part of such tax levy may be pledged in addition to the revenues of such facilities to the payment of such bonds, and upon the pledge thereof such part of said levy so pledged shall not be reduced while such bonds are outstanding and unpaid. If the board of supervisors of the county should provide for special improvement bonds as outlined in Section 19-5-191, the funds received from the charges assessed to the properties being benefited shall be pledged, separately or in conjunction with the revenues and the avails of taxes described above, for payment of such bonds, and such assessments shall not be reduced while such bonds are outstanding and unpaid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-29; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 9; Laws, 1973, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 457, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 151, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§ 19-5-183.
Issuance, form and contents of bonds.

The board of commissioners of any district created pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 may issue bonds of such district by resolution spread upon the minutes of such board. Bonds may be issued from time to time without an election being held upon the question of their issuance unless the board of commissioners of the district is presented with a petition for an election upon the question of issuance signed by twenty percent (20%) or one hundred fifty (150), whichever is the lesser, of the qualified electors residing within the district. The resolution authorizing any issue of bonds other than the initial issue shall be published in a manner similar to the publication of the resolution, as outlined in Section 19-5-157. If an election is required, it shall be held in substantial accord with the election outlined in Section 19-5-157. The cost of this election shall be borne by the district.

All bonds shall be lithographed or engraved and printed in two (2) or more colors to prevent counterfeiting. They shall be in denominations of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and may be registered as issued, and shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward. Each such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued, the total amount authorized to be issued, the interest on the bond, that it is payable to bearer and that the interest to accrue thereon is evidenced by proper coupons attached thereto.

Such bonds shall contain such covenants and provisions; shall be executed; shall be in such form, format, type, denomination or denominations; shall be payable as to principal and interest, at such place or places; and shall mature at such time or times, all as shall be determined by such board of commissioners and set forth in the resolution pursuant to which such bonds shall be issued. The date of maturity of such bonds shall not exceed forty (40) years from the date of the bond, except that on special improvement pollution abatement bonds, special improvement water bonds, or special improvement water and sewer bonds the date of maturity shall not exceed twenty-five (25) years from their date.

All bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates not to exceed a greater net interest cost to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, no bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually, or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bonds may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year. No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and supplemental coupons, cancelled coupons and zero interest coupons will not be permitted; no interest coupon shall vary more than twenty-five percent (25%) in interest rate from any other interest coupon in the same bond issue; and the interest rate on any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed that allowed in Section 75-17-103.

Such bonds shall be signed by the chairman and secretary-treasurer of the commission with the seal of the commission affixed thereto; however, the coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such chairman and secretary-treasurer.

Any provisions of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and interest coupons issued pursuant to the authority of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall be securities within the meaning of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, being Sections 75-8-101 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-30; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 10; Laws, 1973, ch. 433, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 19-5-185.
Sale of bonds; bids; refunding; validation.

The bonds issued under Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall be sold upon sealed bids in the manner provided for in Section 31-19-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, in conformity with the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207; however, bonds may be sold to the United States of America or an agency or instrumentality thereof at private sale.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in a multiple of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) or in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named. Any premium must be paid in bank funds as a part of the purchase price, and bids shall not contemplate the cancellation of any interest coupon or the waiver of interest or other concession by the bidder as a substitute for bank funds.

Any bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 may be refunded in like manner as revenue bonds of municipalities shall be refunded.

Any bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall be submitted to validation under the provisions of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, inclusive, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-31; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-187.
Statutory lien of bondholders; appointment of receiver in case of default.

There is hereby created a statutory lien to the nature of a mortgage lien upon any system or systems acquired or constructed in accordance with Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207, including all extensions and improvements thereof or combinations thereof subsequently made, which lien shall be in favor of the holder or holders of any bonds issued pursuant to said sections, and all such property shall remain subject to such statutory lien until the payment in full of the principal of and interest on said bonds. Any holder of said bonds or any of the coupons representing interest thereon may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, in any court of competent jurisdiction, protect and enforce such statutory lien and compel the performance of all duties required by said sections, including the making and collection of sufficient rates for the service or services, the proper accounting thereof, and the performance of any duties required by covenants with the holders of any bonds issued in accordance herewith.

If any default is made in the payment of the principal of or interest on such bonds, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer said district and said system or systems, with power to charge and collect rates sufficient to provide for the payment of all bonds and obligations outstanding against said system or systems, and for payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues thereof in conformity with the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 and any covenants with bondholders.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-32; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-189.
Tax levies.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section for levies for fire protection purposes and subsection (3) of this section for certain districts providing water service, the board of supervisors of the county in which any such district exists may, according to the terms of the resolution, levy a special tax, not to exceed four (4) mills annually, on all of the taxable real property in such district, the avails of which shall be paid over to the board of commissioners of the district to be used either for the operation, support and maintenance of the district or for the retirement of any bonds issued by the district, or for both.

The proceeds derived from two (2) mills of the levy authorized herein shall be included in the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321, and the proceeds derived from any additional millage levied under this subsection in excess of two (2) mills shall be excluded from such limitation for the first year of such additional levy and shall be included within such limitation in any year thereafter.

In respect to fire protection purposes, the board of supervisors of the county in which any such district exists on July 1, 1987, may levy a special tax annually, not to exceed the tax levied for such purposes for the 1987 fiscal year on all of the taxable real property in such district, the avails of which shall be paid over to the board of commissioners of the district to be used either for the operation, support and maintenance of the fire protection district or for the retirement of any bonds issued by the district for fire protection purposes, or for both. Any such district for which no taxes have been levied for the 1987 fiscal year may be treated as having been created after July 1, 1987, for the purposes of this subsection.

In respect to fire protection purposes, the board of supervisors of the county in which any such district is created after July 1, 1987, may, according to the terms of the resolution of intent to incorporate the district, levy a special tax not to exceed two (2) mills annually on all of the taxable real property in such district, the avails of which shall be paid over to the board of commissioners of the district to be used either for the operation, support and maintenance of the fire protection district or for the retirement of any bonds issued by the district for fire protection purposes, or for both; however, the board of supervisors may increase the tax levy under this subsection as provided for in paragraph (c) of this subsection.

The tax levy under this subsection may be increased only when the board of supervisors has determined the need for additional revenues. Prior to levying a tax increase under this paragraph, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to levy the tax. The resolution shall describe the amount of the increase in the tax levy and the purposes for which the proceeds of the additional tax will be used. The board of supervisors shall have a copy of the resolution published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the county and having a general circulation therein. If no newspaper is published in the county, then notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county. A copy of the resolution shall also be posted at three (3) public places in the county for a period of at least twenty-one (21) days during the time of its publication in a newspaper. If more than twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the district shall file with the clerk of the board of supervisors, within twenty-one (21) days after adoption of the resolution of intent to increase the tax levy, a petition requesting an election on the question of the increase in tax levy, then and in that event such increase shall not be made unless authorized by a majority of the votes cast at an election to be called and held for that purpose within the district. Notice of such election shall be given, the election shall be held and the result thereof determined, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in the county. If an election results in favor of the increase in the tax levy or if no election is required, the board of supervisors may increase the tax levy. The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to have the tax imposed.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this subsection to the contrary, in any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and the State of Louisiana, the board of supervisors may levy not to exceed four (4) mills annually on all the taxable real property within any fire protection district, the avails of which shall be paid over to the board of commissioners of the district to be used either for the operation, support and maintenance of the fire protection district or for the retirement of any bonds issued by the district for fire protection purposes, or for both. Prior to levying the tax under this paragraph, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to levy the tax. The resolution shall describe the amount of the tax levy and the purposes for which the proceeds of the tax will be used. The board of supervisors shall have a copy of the resolution published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the county and having a general circulation therein. If no newspaper is published in the county, then notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county. A copy of the resolution shall also be posted at three (3) public places in the county for a period of at least twenty-one (21) days during the time of its publication in a newspaper. If more than twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the district shall file with the clerk of the board of supervisors, within twenty-one (21) days after adoption of the resolution of intent to levy the tax, a petition requesting an election on the question of the levy of such tax, then and in that event such tax levy shall not be made unless authorized by a majority of the votes cast at an election to be called and held for that purpose within the district. Notice of such election shall be given, the election shall be held and the result thereof determined, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in the county. If an election results in favor of the tax levy or if no election is required, the board of supervisors may levy such tax. The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to have the tax imposed.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this subsection to the contrary, in any county bordering on the Mississippi River in which legal gaming is conducted and in which U.S. Highway 61 intersects with Highway 4, the board of supervisors may levy a special tax not to exceed five (5) mills annually on all the taxable real and personal property within any fire protection district, except for utilities as defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i) and (iii), the avails of which shall be paid over to the board of commissioners of the district to be used either for the operation, support and maintenance of the fire protection district or for the retirement of any bonds issued by the district for fire protection purposes, or for both. Before levying the tax under this paragraph, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to levy the tax. The resolution shall describe the amount of the tax levy and the purposes for which the proceeds of the tax will be used. The board of supervisors shall have a copy of the resolution published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the county and having a general circulation therein. If no newspaper is published in the county, then notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having general circulation in the county. A copy of the resolution shall also be posted at three (3) public places in the county for a period of at least twenty-one (21) days during the time of its publication in a newspaper. If more than twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the district shall file with the clerk of the board of supervisors, within twenty-one (21) days after adoption of the resolution of intent to levy the tax, a petition requesting an election of the questions of the levy of such tax, then and in that event such tax levy shall not be made unless authorized by a majority of the votes cast at an election to be called and held for that purpose within the district. Notice of such election shall be given, the election shall be held and the result thereof determined, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in the county. If an election results in favor of the tax levy or if no election is required, the board of supervisors may levy such tax. The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to have the tax imposed.

Any taxes levied under this subsection shall be excluded from the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321.

For any district authorized under Section 19-5-151(2), the board of supervisors shall not levy the special tax authorized in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-33; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 13; Laws, 1986, ch. 445; Laws, 1987, ch. 507, § 15; Laws, 1988, ch. 371; Laws, 1991, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 304, § 7; Laws, 2016, ch. 458, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 2016).

§ 19-5-191.
Assessment and collection of charges against improved property.

Funds for debt service for special improvement pollution abatement bonds, special improvement water bonds, or special improvement water and sewer bonds issued in lieu of or in conjunction with revenue bonds and/or tax-supported bonds shall be provided by charges upon the properties benefited according to procedures set forth in this section.

So long as any special improvement bond authorized by Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall remain outstanding, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors, at the time annual county tax levies are made, to levy such assessments as are certified to them by the district as being due and payable at a stated time. It shall be the duty of the tax collector of the county in which the district lies to collect such charges and pay the funds collected to the board of commissioners of the district for payment to interest and principal and to the retirement of bonds issued by the district in accord with the maturities schedule pertaining thereto.

One of the following procedures may be utilized in providing funds as authorized by this section:

Funds for debt service may be provided by charges assessed against the property abutting upon the sewer, or abutting upon the railroad and/or utility right-of-way, street, road, highway, easement or alley in which such sewer mains or water mains are installed according to the frontage thereof.

The board of commissioners of the district, after giving notice and hearing protests in the manner prescribed by Sections 21-41-5 and 21-41-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall by resolution spread upon its minutes define the services to be offered and the entire area to be benefited by each improvement; each such improvement may be designated as a project, or all such improvements may be designated as one project. However, if forty percent (40%) of the property owners or the owners of more than forty percent (40%) of the front footage of the property involved and actually residing on property owned by them and included within that part of any street, avenue, etc., ordered to be specially improved, or otherwise actually occupying property owned by them and included within that area designated as a project, shall file a protest, then the improvement shall not be made and the assessment shall not be made.

The resolution shall direct that the cost to be assessed against each lot or parcel of land shall be determined by dividing the entire assessable cost of the project by the total number of front feet fronting on the street, easement or other right-of-way in which all of the mains embraced within the project are installed and multiplying the quotient by the total number of front feet in any particular lot or parcel of land fronting on the street, easement or other right-of-way in which sewer mains or water mains are installed. The result thereof shall be delivered by governing authorities of the district to the county board of supervisors as the amount of special tax to be assessed against each lot or piece of ground for the owner’s part of the total cost of the improvements.

The resolution, at the discretion of the governing authorities of the district, may provide for the district to pay the assessment against any property abutting a sewer or water improvement, if the property whose assessment is being paid by the district is occupied by a contributor or consumer connected to the sewer or water system who is, or will be, paying service charges at the time the assessment roll maintained by the district is confirmed; provided, however, such payment shall not exceed an amount equal to that assessed against any one hundred twenty-five (125) feet of frontage of abutting property in a project.

The resolution may, at the discretion of the governing authorities of the district, provide for the district to pay the assessment against any property abutting a section of sewer main or water main designated as necessary and essential to the overall operation of such system or systems; provided, however, no service shall be provided to any such abutting property until and unless all such payments made by the district are repaid to the district by the owners of such benefited property.

Funds for debt service may be provided by charges assessed against a lot or block in a recorded subdivision of land or by other appropriately designated parcel or tract of land in accord with the following procedure:

The board of commissioners of the district, after giving notice and hearing protests in the manner prescribed by Sections 21-41-5 and 21-41-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall by resolution spread upon its minutes define the services to be offered and the entire area to be benefited by each improvement; each such improvement may be designated as a project, or all such improvements may be designated as one (1) project. However, if forty percent (40%) of the property owners or the owners of more than forty percent (40%) of the front footage of the property involved and actually residing on property owned by them and included within that part of any street, avenue, etc., ordered to be specially improved, or otherwise actually occupying property owned by them and included within that area designated as a project, shall file a protest, then the improvement shall not be made and the assessment shall not be made.

Charges shall be assessed in accord with the provisions of Sections 21-41-9 through 21-41-21, 21-41-25 to 21-41-39, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The resolution providing for assessments under the provisions of subsection (c)(2) of this section, at the discretion of the governing authorities of the district, may provide for the district to pay the assessment against any lot or parcel of ground not exceeding one (1) acre in size, if such property is occupied by a contributor or consumer connected to the sewer or water system who is, or will be, paying service charges at the time the assessment roll maintained by the district is confirmed.

The resolution providing for assessment of benefited properties under this procedure shall provide for appropriate payment to debt service accounts by property owners not included in the original assessment roll but benefited by facilities installed with funds provided by such assessments at, or prior to, the time at which a nonassessed but benefited property is actually served by said facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-34; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 14; Laws, 1973, ch. 433, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1973).

§ 19-5-193.
Limitations upon holders of bonds.

No holder or holders of any bonds issued pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall ever have the right to compel the levy of any tax to pay said bonds or the interest thereon except where the board of supervisors of the county has made a levy of a special tax and consented to the pledge thereof, all as is provided in Sections 19-5-181 and 19-5-189.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-35; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-195.
Rates, fees, tolls or charges for use of system.

The board of commissioners of the district issuing bonds pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees, tolls or charges for the services, facilities and commodities of its system or systems; shall prescribe penalties for the nonpayment thereof; and shall revise such rates, fees, tolls or charges from time to time whenever necessary to insure the economic operation of such system or systems. The rates, fees, tolls or charges prescribed shall be, as nearly as possible, such as will always produce revenue at least sufficient to: (a) provide for all expenses of operation and maintenance of the system or systems, including reserves therefor, (b) pay when due all bonds and interest thereon for the payment of which such revenues are or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, including reserves therefor, and (c) provide funds for reasonable expansions, extensions and improvements of service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-36; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-197.
Exemption from taxation.

The property and revenue of such district shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation. Bonds issued pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes, and it may be so stated on the face of said bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-37; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-199.
Construction contracts.

All construction contracts by the district where the amount of the contract shall exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) shall, and construction contracts of less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) may, be made upon at least three (3) weeks’ public notice. Such notice shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such county or having general circulation therein. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such notice for the receipt of bids, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. The notice shall state the thing to be done and invite sealed proposals, to be filed with the secretary of the district, to do the work. In all such cases, before the notice shall be published, plans and specifications for the work shall be prepared by a registered professional engineer and shall be filed with the secretary of the district and there remain. The board of commissioners of the district shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder who will comply with the terms imposed by such commissioners and enter into bond with sufficient sureties to be approved by the commissioners in such penalty as shall be fixed by the commissioners; however, in no case shall such bond be less than the contract price, conditioned for the prompt, proper efficient performance of the contract. Contracts of less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) may be negotiated; however, the board of commissioners shall invite and receive written proposals for the work from at least three (3) contractors regularly engaged in the type of work involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-38; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-201.
Annexations to district.

Any area adjacent to any district created pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 and situated within the same county as the district, and not being situated within the corporate boundaries of any existing municipality, may be annexed to and become a part of such district by the same procedure prescribed in Sections 19-5-153 through 19-5-159 for the original creation of the district. All costs incident to the publication of notice and all other costs incident to the hearings, election and proceedings shall be paid by the district.

The district shall have the exclusive right to provide any of the services for which it was created in the annexed territory; however, if any part of the annexed territory is then being served by another corporate agency with any such service, the district shall, at the option of the other corporate agency, either relinquish its prior right to serve the area occupied by the corporate agency or acquire by purchase the facilities of such corporate agency, together with its franchise rights to serve such area. If the annexation affects only a portion of the corporate agency’s facility, the cash consideration for such purchase shall not be less than:

the present-day reproduction cost, new, of the facilities being acquired, less depreciation computed on a straight-line basis; plus

an amount equal to the cost of constructing any necessary facilities to reintegrate the system of the corporate agency outside the annexed area after detaching the portion to be acquired by the district; plus

an annual amount payable each year for a period of ten (10) years equal to the sum of twenty-five per cent (25%) of the revenues received from sales to consumers within the annexed area during the last twelve (12) months.

If the option is for the district to purchase, upon notification thereof, the district shall be obligated to buy and pay for, and the corporate agency shall be obligated to convey to the district, all its service facilities and franchise rights in the annexed area, free and clear of all mortgage liens and encumbrances for the aforesaid cash consideration.

If the annexed territory affects all of the properties and facilities of such other corporate agency, then all of such property constituting the entire system or facility of the corporate agency shall be acquired by the district in accordance with such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon, and the district shall have the authority to assume the operation of such entire system or facility and to assume and become liable for the payment of any notes, bonds or other obligations that are outstanding against said system or facility and payable from the revenues therefrom.

If the district is notified to relinquish its prior right to serve the annexed area, the district shall grant the corporate agency a franchise to serve within the annexed territory; however, the corporate agency shall be entitled to serve only such customers or locations within the annexed area as it served on the date that such annexation became effective.

The annexed territory shall become liable for any existing indebtedness of the district and be subject to any taxes levied by the board of supervisors under Section 19-5-189 in payment of the district’s indebtedness.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-39; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-203.
State and federal cooperation.

The board of commissioners of any district created pursuant to the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall have the authority to enter into cooperative agreements with the state or federal government, or both; to obtain financial assistance in the form of loans or grants as may be available from the state or federal government, or both; and to execute and deliver at private sale notes or bonds as evidence of such indebtedness in the form and subject to the terms and conditions as may be imposed by the state or federal government, or both; and to pledge the income and revenues of the district, or the income and revenues from any part of the area embraced in the district, in payment thereof. It is the purpose and intention of this section to authorize districts to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the state or federal government, or both, in the planning, construction, maintenance or operation of project facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-30; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 10; Laws, 1973, ch. 433, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1973).

§ 19-5-204.
When district facilities may be required to be commensurate with those of an adjoining municipality.

When any board of supervisors creates a district within three (3) miles of the corporate boundaries of any existing municipality, the municipality is empowered to require such district to construct and maintain all facilities, whether purchased or constructed, to standards commensurate with those of the adjoining municipality; provided, however, the governing authorities of the municipalities may specifically waive compliance with any or all of such requirements.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1973).

§ 19-5-205.
Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 are full and complete authority.

Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the creation of such districts and for the issuance of such bonds. No proceedings shall be required for the creation of such districts or for the issuance of such bonds other than those provided for and required herein. All the necessary powers to be exercised by the board of supervisors of such county and by the board of commissioners of any such district, in order to carry out the provisions of such sections, are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-31; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).

§ 19-5-207.
Financial statements.

Within ninety (90) days after the close of each fiscal year, the board of commissioners shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a sworn statement showing the financial condition of the district, the earnings for the fiscal year just ended, a statement of the water and sewer rates being charged, and a brief statement of the method used in arriving at such rates. Such statement shall also be filed with the board of supervisors creating the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-40; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).